Nevada, session 83, AB190.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 533 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Fund for Hydrological Studies is hereby created as a
special revenue fund in the State Treasury.
2. If a hydrological study is required by the State Engineer
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 533.368 and the study will be
conducted in a county whose population is less than 100,000,
except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the applicant must
pay a cash deposit to the State Engineer which is sufficient to
defray 50 percent of the cost of the study.
3. Upon the applicant paying a cash deposit pursuant to
subsection 2, the State Engineer shall, except as otherwise
provided in this section, make a grant of money from the Fund
equal to the amount deposited by the applicant to pay the
remaining cost of the study. If there is insufficient money
available in:
(a) The Fund, the State Engineer shall make a grant of money
from the Account for Studies Concerning Water established by
NRS 533.369 to defray any remaining cost of the study.
(b) The Account for Studies Concerning Water, the applicant
may:
(1) Pay the remaining cost of the study; or
(2) Withdraw his or her application and receive a refund of
any money deposited pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The State Engineer or a person designated by the State
Engineer shall not conduct a hydrological study required pursuant
to subsection 1 of NRS 533.368 until the full cost of the study is
paid in accordance with the requirements of this section.
-
*AB190*

– 3 –
5. The money received by the State Engineer pursuant to this
section must be used to defray the cost of conducting a
hydrological study in a county whose population is less than
100,000 which is required pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
533.368. Any money paid by an applicant or the State Engineer
that exceeds the amount required pursuant to subsection 2 to
conduct a study must be refunded to the applicant or the Fund or
Account for Studies Concerning Water, as applicable, in an
amount which is proportional to the deposits contributed by the
applicant or the State Engineer pursuant to this section.
6. The interest and income earned on the money in the Fund,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
Fund.
7. Any balance remaining in the Fund does not revert to the
State Treasury at the end of any fiscal year.
Sec. 2. NRS 533.368 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.368 1. If the State Engineer determines that a
hydrological study, an environmental study or any other study is
necessary before the State Engineer makes a final determination on
an application pursuant to NRS 533.370 and the applicant, a
governmental agency or other person has not conducted such a
study or the required study is not available, the State Engineer shall
advise the applicant of the need for the study and the type of study
required.
2. The required study must be conducted by the State Engineer
or by a person designated by the State Engineer, the applicant or a
consultant approved by the State Engineer, as determined by the
State Engineer.
3. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act,
the applicant shall bear the cost of a study required pursuant to
subsection 1 [. A] and a study must not be conducted by the State
Engineer or by a person designated by the State Engineer until the
applicant has paid a cash deposit to the State Engineer which is
sufficient to defray the cost of the study.
4. The State Engineer shall:
(a) Consult with the applicant and the governing body of the
county or counties in which the point of diversion and the place of
use is located concerning the scope and progress of the study.
(b) Send a copy of the completed study to all attorneys of
record, to a public library, if any, or other public building located in
the county of origin, to the county or counties in which the point of
diversion and the place of use is located and to the governing bodies
of the county of origin and of the county or counties in which the
point of diversion and the place of use is located.
-
*AB190*

– 4 –
5. The State Engineer may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section [.] and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. NRS 533.369 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.369 1. [All] Except as otherwise provided in section 1
of this act, all money collected pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
533.364 or subsection 3 of NRS 533.368 must be deposited with the
State Treasurer for credit to a special Account for Studies
Concerning Water.
2. The interest and income earned on the money in the Account
for Studies Concerning Water, after deducting any applicable
charges, must be credited to the Account.
3. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act,
the money received pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 533.364 or
subsection 3 of NRS 533.368 must be used to defray the cost of
conducting the studies required pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
533.368 and the inventories required pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 533.364. Any money paid by an applicant that exceeds the
amount required to conduct a study must be refunded to the
applicant.
4. Any balance remaining in the Account does not revert to the
State General Fund at the end of the fiscal year.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Fund for Hydrological Studies created by
section 1 of this act for grants of money required to be made by the
State Engineer pursuant to section 1 of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $3,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $2,000,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 5. 1. This section and section 4 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1, 2 and 3 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
-
*AB190*

– 5 –
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB190*